Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 8. Winding Up Partnership Business.

§ 50-73.117.
Events causing dissolution and winding up of partnership business.

A partnership is dissolved, and its business shall be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

In a partnership at will, the partnership’s having notice from a partner, other than a partner who is dissociated under subdivisions 2 through 12 of §

50-73.109

, of that partner’s express will to withdraw as a partner, on a later date specified by the partner in the notice or, if no later date is specified, the date of notice;

In a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking:

Within 90 days after a partner’s dissociation by death or otherwise under subdivisions 6 through 12 of §

50-73.109

or wrongful dissociation under subsection B of §

50-73.110

, the express will of at least one half of the remaining partners to wind up the partnership’s business, for which purpose a partner’s rightful dissociation pursuant to subdivision B 2 a of §

50-73.110

constitutes the expression of that partner’s will to wind up the partnership business;

The express will of all of the partners to wind up the partnership business; or

The expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement resulting in the winding up of the partnership business;

An event that makes it unlawful for all or substantially all of the business of the partnership to be continued, but a cure of illegality within 90 days after notice to the partnership of the event is effective retroactively to the date of the event for purposes of this section;

On application by a partner, a judicial determination that:

On application by a transferee of a partner’s transferable interest, a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business:

a.

The economic purpose of the partnership is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

b.

Another partner has engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner; or

c.

It is not otherwise reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the partnership agreement; or

a.

After the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, if the partnership was for a definite term or particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer; or

b.

At any time, if the partnership was a partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2006, c. 912.

Cross references.

As to disposition of known claims against dissolved registered limited liability partnerships, see §

50-73.137:2

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 rewrote subdivision 2 a.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 40.1.

§ 50-73.118.
Partnership continues after dissolution.

Subject to subsection B, a partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its business. The partnership is terminated when the winding up of its business is completed.

At any time after the dissolution of a partnership and before the winding up of its business is completed, all of the partners, including any dissociating partner other than a wrongfully dissociating partner, may waive the right to have the partnership’s business wound up and the partnership terminated. In that event:

The partnership resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred, and any liability incurred by the partnership or a partner after the dissolution and before the waiver is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

The rights of a third party accruing under subdivision 1 of §

50-73.120

or arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or received a notification of the waiver may not be adversely affected.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 45, 47.

§ 50-73.119.
Right to wind up partnership business.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may participate in winding up the partnership’s business, but on application of any partner, partner’s legal representative, or transferee, the circuit court, for good cause shown, may order judicial supervision of the winding up.

The legal representative of the last surviving partner may wind up a partnership’s business.

A person winding up a partnership’s business may preserve the partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, settle and close the partnership’s business, dispose of and transfer the partnership’s property, discharge the partnership’s liabilities, distribute the assets of the partnership pursuant to §

50-73.123

, settle disputes by mediation or arbitration, and perform other necessary acts.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 45.

§ 50-73.120.
Partner’s power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to §

50-73.121

, a partnership is bound by a partner’s act after dissolution that:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

Would have bound the partnership under §

50-73.91

before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.121.
Statement of dissolution.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution for a partnership that has filed a statement of partnership authority that has not been canceled stating the name of the partnership, the identification number issued by the Commission to the partnership, and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.

A statement of dissolution cancels a filed statement of partnership authority for the purposes of subsection D of §

50-73.93

and is a limitation on authority for the purposes of subsection E of §

50-73.93

.

For the purposes of §§

50-73.91

and

50-73.120

, a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners’ authority as a result of the statement of dissolution 90 days after it is filed.

After filing and, if appropriate, recording a statement of dissolution, a dissolved partnership may file and, if appropriate, record a statement of partnership authority which will operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subsections D and E of §

50-73.93

in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2003, c. 567.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 567 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.”

§ 50-73.122.
Partner’s liability to other partners after dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B of this section or in subsection C of §

50-73.96

, after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner’s share of any partnership liability incurred under §

50-73.120

.

A partner who, with knowledge of the dissolution, causes the partnership to incur a liability under subdivision 2 of §

50-73.120

by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the liability.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.123.
Settlement of accounts and contributions among partners.

In winding up a partnership’s business, the assets of the partnership, including the contributions of the partners required by this section, shall be applied to discharge its obligations to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners who are creditors. Any surplus shall be applied to pay in cash the net amount distributable to partners in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection B.

Each partner is entitled to a settlement of all partnership accounts upon winding up the partnership business. In settling accounts among the partners, the profits and losses that result from the liquidation of the partnership assets shall be credited and charged to the partners’ accounts. The partnership shall make a distribution to a partner in an amount equal to any excess of the credits over the charges in the partner’s account. A partner shall contribute to the partnership an amount equal to any excess of the charges over the credits in the partner’s account that is attributable to an obligation for which the partner is liable under §

50-73.96

.

If a partner fails or is not obligated to contribute, each other partner shall contribute, in the proportion in which that partner shares partnership losses, the additional amount necessary to satisfy any partnership obligations for which the partner is liable under §

50-73.96

.

A partner or partner’s legal representative may recover from the other partners any contributions on account of obligations for which the other partners are liable under §

50-73.96

that the partner or legal representative makes to the extent the amount contributed exceeds that partner’s share of the partnership obligations for which the partner or legal representative is personally liable under §

50-73.96

.

After the settlement of accounts, each partner shall contribute, in the proportion in which the partner shares partnership losses, the amount necessary to satisfy partnership obligations for which the partner is liable under §

50-73.96

and that were not known at the time of the settlement.

The estate of a deceased partner is liable for the partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a partnership or a partner, may enforce a partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 56, 70, 75, 77, 78.